dictionaries/pt_PT.aff
SFX K   r              m              dizer
SFX K   er             ia             dizer
SFX K   er             ias            dizer
SFX K   er             íamos          dizer
SFX K   er             íeis           dizer
SFX K   er             iam            dizer
SFX K   zer            sse            dizer
SFX K   zer            sseste         dizer
SFX K   zer            sse            dizer
SFX K   zer            ssemos         dizer
SFX K   zer            ssestes        dizer
SFX K   zer            sseram         dizer
SFX K   zer            ssera          dizer
SFX K   zer            sseras         dizer
SFX K   zer            sséramos       dizer
SFX K   zer            sséreis        dizer
SFX K   zer            rei            dizer
SFX K   zer            rás            dizer
SFX K   zer            rá             dizer
SFX K   zer            remos          dizer
SFX K   zer            reis           dizer
SFX K   zer            rão            dizer
SFX K   zer            ga             dizer
SFX K   zer            gas            dizer
SFX K   zer            gamos          dizer
SFX K   zer            gais           dizer
SFX K   zer            gam            dizer
SFX K   zer            ssesse         dizer
SFX K   zer            ssesses        dizer
SFX K   zer            sséssemos      dizer
SFX K   zer            ssésseis       dizer
SFX K   zer            ssessem        dizer
SFX K   zer            sser           dizer
SFX K   zer            sseres         dizer
SFX K   zer            sser           dizer
SFX K   zer            ssermos        dizer
SFX K   zer            sserdes        dizer
SFX K   zer            sserem         dizer
SFX K   zer            ria            dizer
SFX K   zer            rias           dizer
SFX K   zer            ríamos         dizer
SFX K   zer            ríeis          dizer
SFX K   zer            riam           dizer
SFX K   r              i              dizer
SFX K   r              ndo            dizer
SFX K   zer            to             dizer
SFX K   zer            ta             dizer
SFX K   zer            tos            dizer
SFX K   zer            tas            dizer
SFX K   0              es             dizer
SFX K   0              mos            dizer
SFX K   0              des            dizer
SFX K   0              em             dizer
SFX K   ar             á              ar
SFX K   er             ê              er

SFX B Y 2
SFX B   r              damente        [ia]r
SFX B   er             idamente       er

SFX o Y 4
SFX o   r              dela           [ai]r
SFX o   r              delas          [ai]r
SFX o   er             idela          er
SFX o   er             idelas         er

SFX y Y 4
SFX y   o              eiro           o
SFX y   o              eiros          o
SFX y   a              eira           a
SFX y   a              eiras          a

SFX w Y 20
SFX w   0              so             o
SFX w   0              sa             o
SFX w   0              sos            o
SFX w   0              sas            o
SFX w   a              oso            a
SFX w   a              osa            a
SFX w   a              osos           a
SFX w   a              osas           a
SFX w   ção            cioso          ção
SFX w   ção            ciosa          ção
SFX w   ção            ciosos         ção
SFX w   ção            ciosas         ção
SFX w   e              oso            e
SFX w   e              osa            e
SFX w   e              osos           e
SFX w   e              osas           e
SFX w   0              oso            [^aeiou]
SFX w   0              osa            [^aeiou]
SFX w   0              osos           [^aeiou]
SFX w   0              osas           [^aeiou]

SFX j Y 25
SFX j   0              izar           l
SFX j   e              izar           e
SFX j   o              izar           o
SFX j   a              zar            ia
SFX j   a              izar           [^i]a
SFX j   0              izado          l
SFX j   e              izado          e
SFX j   o              izado          o
SFX j   a              zado           ia
SFX j   a              izado          [^i]a
SFX j   0              izada          l
SFX j   e              izada          e
SFX j   o              izada          o
SFX j   a              zada           ia
SFX j   a              izada          [^i]a
SFX j   0              izados         l
SFX j   e              izados         e
SFX j   o              izados         o
SFX j   a              zados          ia
SFX j   a              izados         [^i]a
SFX j   0              izadas         l
SFX j   e              izadas         e
SFX j   o              izadas         o
SFX j   a              zadas          ia
SFX j   a              izados         [^i]a

SFX G Y 29
SFX G   o              ice            [^çgc]o
SFX G   ço             cice           ço
SFX G   go             guice          go
SFX G   co             quice          co
SFX G   a              ice            [^çgc]a
SFX G   ça             cice           ça
SFX G   ga             guice          ga
SFX G   ca             quice          ca
SFX G   e              ice            e
SFX G   0              ice            r
SFX G   0              ice            [^v][^q]l
SFX G   vel            bilice         [^áí]vel
SFX G   ável           abilice        ável
SFX G   ível           ibilice        ível
SFX G   z              cice           z
SFX G   o              ices           [^çgc]o
SFX G   ço             cices          ço
SFX G   go             guices         go
SFX G   co             quices         co
SFX G   a              ices           [^çgc]a
SFX G   ça             cices          ça
SFX G   ga             guices         ga
SFX G   ca             quices         ca
SFX G   0              ices           [^v][^q]l
SFX G   e              ices           e
SFX G   0              ices           r
SFX G   vel            bilices        [^áí]vel
SFX G   ável           abilices       ável
SFX G   ível           ibilices       ível

SFX J Y 7
SFX J   r              cionismo       [ai]r
SFX J   er             icionismo      er
SFX J   ar             ómetro         ar
SFX J   ar             ódromo         ar
SFX J   a              ódromo         a
SFX J   o              ódromo         o
SFX J   e              ódromo         e
REP 24
REP por pro
REP pre per
REP damente mente
REP mente damente
REP iz íz
REP cao ção
REP ç ss
REP ss ç
REP c ss
REP ss c
REP ch x
REP x ch
REP cç x
REP x cç
REP k qu
REP íti ití
REP ití íti
REP issí íssi
REP ilí íli
REP íli ilí
REP ífi ifí
REP ifí ífi
REP nume mune
REP coen quen

MAP 11
MAP aá
MAP aã
MAP aâ
MAP eé
MAP eê
MAP ií
MAP cç
MAP oó
MAP oô
MAP oõ
MAP uú
